Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2287.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(b.2) Initial identification card fees.--(1) No fee shall be charged for an initial identification card, including for a photograph required for an initial identification card, to an individual who affirms in writing that the individual:(i) i s 18 years of age or older; (ii) is a first-time voter;(iii) is eligible to vote in this Commonwealth; and(iv) does not possess a valid Pennsylvania driver's 123456789101112131415161718 license.(2) The department may require additional information to determine an individual's identity and eligibility under this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2287PN2996 - 2 - 123456